Louisiana, session 2026, SB126.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:17.1(C) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§17.1. Prescribed burning by noncertified prescribed burn managers
* * *
C. The commissioner of agriculture and forestry is authorized to may
promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act to carry out the intent and purposes of this Section.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-377 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 126